Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-370
Unreasonable confinement,
defined.

Unreasonable confinement means confinement
which intentionally causes physical injury to a vulnerable adult or false imprisonment as described in
section 28-314 or 28-315.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 23;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 9.